Tennessee, session 114, HB0437.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-8-402, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) A county that has adopted this part pursuant to subsection (a) may rescind
such adoption by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0437
001967
- 1 -